Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 2
INNKEEPERS' RIGHTS

6-25-201. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Innkeeper" means the owner, operator, or manager of a lodging establishment.

"Lodging establishment" means a bed and breakfast, as defined in section 44-3-103 (4), or a hotel, motel, resort, or public inn, as defined in section 6-25-101 (3).

"Minor" means a person under eighteen years of age.

"Resort" means a hotel with related sports and recreational facilities for the convenience of its guests or the general public located contiguous or adjacent to the hotel.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1245), ch. 240, p. 988, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(2) amended, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1077, § 4, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-44-301 as it existed prior to 2017.

6-25-202. Innkeepers' right to refuse accommodations - exceptions.

An innkeeper has the right to refuse or deny accommodations, facilities, and the privileges of a lodging establishment to any person who is not willing or able to pay for the accommodations, facilities, and services. The innkeeper shall have the right to require a prospective guest to demonstrate his or her ability to pay by cash, valid credit card, or a validated check, and if the prospective guest is a minor, the innkeeper may require a parent or legal guardian of the minor or other responsible adult:

To provide a valid credit card number or agree, in writing, to pay for the cost of:

The guest room, including applicable taxes;

All charges made by the minor; and

Any damages caused by the minor or the minor's guests to the guest room or its furnishings; or

To provide an advance cash payment to cover the cost of the guest room for all nights reserved, including applicable taxes, plus a cash deposit to be held toward the payment of any charges made by the minor and any damages to the guest room or its furnishings. The cash deposit shall be refunded, unless applied to charges or damages, following a joint inspection of the room. It is the obligation of the guest to join the innkeeper during the inspection. Should the guest fail to join the innkeeper, the guest thereby waives his or her right to the joint inspection. The refund, if any, shall immediately be made to the extent it is not used to cover the described charges or damages.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1245), ch. 240, p. 989, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-44-302 as it existed prior to 2017.